Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 54. Big Game Guides and Related Occupations.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to forfeiture of equipment for fish and game violations, see AS

16.05.195

.
For provisions relating to the requirement that certain hunters be accompanied by a licensed guide, see AS

16.05.407

and

16.05.408

.

Administrative Code. —

For big game commercial services board, see 12 AAC 75.